Hawaii statutes.
[§342L-32.5] Delivery, deposit, and
acceptance prohibition. No person shall deliver to, deposit into, or
accept a regulated substance into an underground storage tank regulated under
this chapter at a facility that has been identified by the department to be
ineligible for such delivery, deposit, or acceptance. The
delivery prohibition may go into effect at a facility before a hearing is
conducted by the director. [L 2009, c 7, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next